New York, session 2025-2026, S887.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2611 of the surrogate's court procedure act is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. (a) In accordance with paragraph (c) of rule 2102 of the civil 4 practice law and rules, a surrogate court clerk or chief clerk shall 5 refuse to accept for filing papers filed in a proceeding only under the 6 following circumstances or as designated in statute, administrative rule 7 or order of the court; 8 (i) the paper does not have a file number; 9 (ii) the petition, decree or order sought to be filed with the court 10 contains the words "et al" or otherwise does not contain a full caption; 11 (iii) the paper sought to be filed with the clerk is filed in the 12 wrong court; 13 (iv) the paper is not signed in accordance with section 130-1.1-a of 14 the rules of the chief administrator; or 15 (v) the paper sought to be filed is in a proceeding subject to elec- 16 tronic filing pursuant to the rules of the chief administrator but is 17 not being filed electronically, and either 18 (A) is not being filed by an unrepresented litigant; or 19 (B) does not include the notice required by paragraph 1 of subdivision 20 d of section 202.5-b of such rules. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02136-02-5 S. 887--A 2 1 (b) The chief clerk shall require the payment of any applicable statu- 2 tory fees, or an order of the court waiving payment of such fees, before 3 accepting a paper for filing. 4 (c) A clerk or chief clerk of the court shall signify a refusal to 5 accept a paper by use of a stamp on the paper indicating the date of the 6 refusal and shall explain in writing on the paper the reason for the 7 refusal. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.